Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1069.
do enact as follows:AB1069,13Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB1069,1,44(1) Legislative council study committee. AB1069,2,35(a) There is established a legislative council study committee to study and 6recommend to the legislature legislative strategies relating to requiring the 1installation of empty conduit lines for future fiber-optic internet expansion, 2commonly known as a “Dig Once Law.” Specifically, the committee shall focus on 3details necessary to implement such a law, including all of the following:AB1069,2,541. Required communication between a municipality, a construction company 5or engineering firm, and the future internet service provider.AB1069,2,662. Determination of ownership of the empty conduit infrastructure.AB1069,2,873. Responsibility for maintenance costs for empty conduit lines and for 8conduit lines that are in use by one or more internet service providers.AB1069,2,1094. Whether a municipality may require larger conduit lines for use by 10multiple internet service providers.AB1069,2,13115. The most effective time to install an empty conduit line, whether during 12road construction, utility construction, initial internet service provider line 13installation, or another time.AB1069,2,15146. Any other details the committee determines are necessary for 15implementation of the law.AB1069,2,1916(b) The committee shall consist of members as determined by the joint 17legislative council. The committee shall submit its recommendations no later than 18January 1, 2027, to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature for distribution to 19the legislature under section 13.172 (2) of the statutes.AB1069,2,2020